test/src/morphology/verb-klasse4_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - tjoehpedh: # verb 4, stem -e, root vowel oe-
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Inf: tjoehpedh
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tjoehpem
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tjoehph
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tjuahpa
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: tjuehpien
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [tjoehpeden, tjoehpijidien]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: tjoehpijægan
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [tjoehpebe, tjoehpijibie]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [tjoehpede, tjoehpijidie]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [tjuehpieh]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [tjoehpim]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [tjoehpih]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tjoehpi]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [tjoehpimen]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [tjoehpiden]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [tjoehpigan]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [tjoehpimh]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tjoehpidh]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tjoehpin]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: tjoehph
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [tjoehpebe, tjoehpijibie]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [tjoehpede, tjoehpijidie]
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+ConNeg: tjoehph
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+Ger: tjoehpeminie
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: tjoehpeme
    tjoehpedh+V+IV+VGen: tjoehpen 
            
  Verb - vïssjedh: # verb 4, stem -ï, root vowel -e-
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Inf: vïssjedh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vïssjem
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vïssjh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: væssja
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: vissjien
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vïssjeden, vïssjijidien]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: vïssjijægan
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [vïssjebe, vïssjijibie]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vïssjede, vïssjijidie]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vissjieh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [vïssjim]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vïssjih]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vïssji]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [vïssjimen]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [vïssjiden]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [vïssjiigan]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vïssjimh]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vïssjidh]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vïssjin]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: vïssjh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [vïssjeden, vïssjijidien]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [vïssjede, vïssjijidie]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+ConNeg: vïssjh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ger: vïssjeminie
    vïssjedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: vïssjeme
    vïssjedh+V+IV+VGen: visjien   
    
  Verb - vïenhtedh: # verb IV, stem -e, root vowel -ïe-
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Inf: vïenhtedh
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vïenhtem
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vïenhth
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veanhta
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: vienhtien
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vïenhteden, vïenhtijidien]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: vienhtieh
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [vïenhtebe, vïenhtijibie]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vïenhtede, vïenhtijidie]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vienhtieh
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [vïenhtim]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vïenhtih]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vïenhti]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [vïenhtimen]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [vïenhtiden]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [vïenhtigan]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vïenhtimh]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vïenhtidh]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vïenhtin]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: vïenhth
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [vïenhteden, vïenhtijidien]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [vïenhtede, vïenhtijidie]
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+ConNeg: vïenhthth
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+Ger: vïenhteminie
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: vïenhteme
    vïenhtedh+V+IV+VGen: vïenhten
        
        
  Verb - vajmedh: # verb IV, stem -e, root vowel -a-
    vajmedh+V+IV+Inf: vajmedh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vajmem
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vajmeh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vajma
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: vejmien
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vajmeden, vajmijidien]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: vajmejægan
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [vajmedh, vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vajmedh, vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vajmedh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vajmedh, vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: vajmedh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [vajmedh, vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [vajmedh, vajmedh]
    vajmedh+V+IV+ConNeg: vajmedh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ger: vajmedh
    vajmedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: vajmedh
    vajmedh+V+IV+VGen: vajmedh 
    
  Verb - vaaksjedh: # verb I, stem -e, root vowel -aa-
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Inf: vaaksjedh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaaksjem
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vaaksjh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaaksja
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: vaeksjien
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vaaksjeden, vaaksjijidien]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: vaaksjijægan
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [vaaksjebe, vaaksjijibie]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vaaksjede, vaaksjijidie]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vaeksjieh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [vaaksjim] 
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vaaksjih]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vaaksji, vaaksjij]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [vaaksjimen]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [vaaksjiden]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [vaaksjigan]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vaaksjimh]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vaaksjidh]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vaaksjin]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: vaaksjh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [vaaksjeden, vaaksjijidien]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [vaaksjede, vaaksjijidie]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+ConNeg: vaaksjh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ger: vaaksjeminie
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: vaaksjeme
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+VGen: vaaksjen
     
  Verb - sovhkedh: # verb I, stem -e, root vowel -o-
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Inf: sovhkedh
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sovhkem
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sovhkh
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: såvhka
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: suvhkien
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [sovhkeden, sovhkijidien]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: sovhkijægan
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [sovhkebe, sovhkede]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [sovhkede, sovhkijidie]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: suvhkieh
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [sovhkim] 
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [sovhkih]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [sovhki,sovhkij]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [sovhkimen]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [sovhkiden]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [sovhkigan]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [sovhkimh]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [sovhkidh]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [sovhkin]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: sovhkh
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [sovhkeden, sovhkijidien]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [sovhkede, sovhkijidie]
    sovhkedh+V+IV+ConNeg: sovhkh
    sovhkedh+V+IV+Ger: sovhkeminie
    sovhkedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: sovhkeminie
    sovhkedh+V+IV+VGen: sovhken

    

    
    
